Illinois, session 104th, SB2604.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $90,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Office of the Attorney General to meet its 8operational expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 9    Section 10. The sum of $11,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for payment of 12awards and grants under the Violent Crime Victims Assistance 13Act. 14    Section 15. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16fund to the Office of the Attorney General for ordinary and 17contingent expenses, awards and grants, and operational 18programs of the Crime Victim Services Division. 19    Section 20. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue   SB2604- 2 -SDS104 00018 JMS 10018 b1Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for ordinary and 2contingent expenses and operational programs of the Medicaid 3Fraud Control Unit. 4    Section 25. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for grants for 7organized retail crime enforcement. 8    Section 30. The sum of $6,850,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 10Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for ordinary and 11contingent expenses and operational programs of the Child 12Support Enforcement Division. 13    Section 35. The sum of $1,200,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Access to Justice 15Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for disbursement to 16the Illinois Equal Justice Foundation pursuant to the Access 17to Justice Act. 18    Section 40. The sum of $1,150,000, or so much thereof as is 19available for use by the Attorney General, is appropriated to 20the Office of the Attorney General from the Illinois Gaming 21Law Enforcement Fund for State law enforcement purposes.   SB2604- 3 -SDS104 00018 JMS 10018 b1    Section 45. The sum of $350,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Attorney 3General from the Domestic Violence Fund pursuant to Public Act 495-711 for grants to public or private nonprofit agencies for 5the purposes of facilitating or providing free domestic 6violence legal advocacy, assistance, or services to victims of 7domestic violence who are married or formerly married or 8parties or former parties to a civil union related to order of 9protection proceedings or other proceedings for civil remedies 10for domestic violence. 11    Section 50. The sum of $3,750,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General 13Tobacco Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for the 14oversight, enforcement, and implementation of the Master 15Settlement Agreement entered in the case of People of the 16State of Illinois v. Philip Morris, et al (Circuit Court of 17Cook County, No. 96L13146), for the administration and 18enforcement of the Tobacco Product Manufacturers' Escrow Act, 19for the handling of tobacco-related litigation, and for other 20law enforcement activities of the Attorney General. 21    Section 55. The sum of $13,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General 23Court Ordered and Voluntary Compliance Payment Projects Fund 24to the Office of the Attorney General for use, subject to   SB2604- 4 -SDS104 00018 JMS 10018 b1pertinent court order or agreement, in the performance of any 2function pertaining to the exercise of the duties of the 3Attorney General, including State law enforcement and public 4education. 5    Section 60. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Charity 7Bureau Fund to the Office of the Attorney General to enforce 8the provisions of the Solicitation for Charity Act and to 9gather and disseminate information about charitable trustees 10and organizations to the public. 11    Section 65. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General 13Whistleblower Reward and Protection Fund to the Office of the 14Attorney General for ordinary and contingent expenses, 15including State law enforcement purposes. 16    Section 70. The sum of $23,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General's 18State Projects and Court Ordered Distribution Fund to the 19Office of the Attorney General for payment of interagency 20agreements, for court-ordered distributions to third parties, 21and subject to pertinent court order, for performance of any 22function pertaining to the exercise of the duties of the 23Attorney General, including State law enforcement and public   SB2604- 5 -SDS104 00018 JMS 10018 b1education. 2    Section 75. The sum of $1,600,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis 4Expungement Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for 5disbursement to the Illinois Equal Justice Foundation for use 6as provided in the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 7    Section 80The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from Violent Crime Victims 9Assistance Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for 10payment of awards and grants under the Violent Crime Victims 11Assistance Act. 12    Section 85.The sum of $350,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from Violent Crime Victims 14Assistance Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for 15grants to public or private nonprofit agencies for the 16purposes of facilitating or providing free domestic violence 17legal advocacy, assistance, or services to victims of domestic 18violence who are married or formerly married or parties or 19former parties to a civil union related to order of protection 20proceedings, or other proceedings for civil remedies for 21domestic violence. 22    Section 90.The sum of $215,000, or so much thereof as may   SB2604- 6 -SDS104 00018 JMS 10018 b1be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General Sex 2Offender Awareness, Training, and Education Fund to the Office 3of the Attorney General to administer the I-SORT program and 4to alert and educate the public, victims, and witnesses of 5their rights under various victim notification laws and for 6training law enforcement agencies, State's Attorneys, and 7medical providers regarding their legal duties concerning the 8prosecution and investigation of sex offenses. 9    Section 100. The sum of $11,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General 11Federal Grant Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for 12funding for federal grants. 13ARTICLE 99914    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152025.